Rules/ruu.twol
Alphabet
  b d j g p t c k v z f s l m n w y ŋ i u e o a ny
  %>:0
  l:r
  %{n%}:0 %{n%}:n
  %{ii%}:0 %{ii%}:i
;

Sets
Letter = b d j g p t c k v z f s l m n w y ŋ i u e o a ny;
Consonant = b d j g p t c k v z f s l m n w y ŋ ny;
Vowel = i u e o a;
Glide = w y;
Nasal = m n ny ŋ;
Obstruent = b d j g p t c k v z f s;

Rules
"5th class iy- prefixation"
%{iy%}:iy => _ %>:0 Vowel;
"5th class i- prefixation"
%{iy%}:i => _ %>:0 Consonant;
"5th class i- prefixation with glide formation"
%{iy%}:y => _ %>:0 [e|o|a];
"Glide formation u&o"
[u:w|o:w] <=> _ %>:0 [i|e|o|a];
"Glide formation i"
i:y <=> _ %>:0 [e|o|a];
"Nasal assimilation n"
[n:m|%{n%}:m] <=> _ %>:0 [p|b|w];
"Liquid fortition"
[l:d|w:p] <=> Nasal %>:0 _;
"Vowel elision"
a:Cx <=> _ %>:0 Cy [[Letter-[Nasal | i | y]] | Nasal [Letter-Obstruent]];
        where Cx in (o e)
              Cy in (o e)
        matched;
"Vowel drop"
a:0 <=> _ %>:0 Cx (%>:0) Nasal Obstruent;
        _ %>:0 Cx (%>:0) [i|y];
        where Cx in (o e a);
"No double n"
[n:0|%{n%}:0] <=> _ %>:0 n;
"o- and -e base demonstratives before consonants"
[%{o%}:o|%{e%}:e] <=> _ %>:0 Consonant;
"o- and e- base demonstratives before vowels"
[%{o%}:y|%{e%}:y] <=> _ %>:0 Vowel;
"Terminal -a and -i before consonants"
[%{a%}:a|%{i%}:i] <=> _ %>:0 Consonant;
"Terminal -a before vowels"
[%{a%}:0|%{i%}:0] <=> _ %>:0 Vowel;
"wa- base before vowels"
%{wa%}:w <=> _ %>:0 Vowel;
"wa- base before consonants 1"
%{wa%}:wa => _ %>:0 Consonant;
"wa- base before consonants 2"
%{wa%}:a => _ %>:0 Consonant;
